test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_cavos_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čavos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    čavos+N+Sg+Nom: čaˊvos
    čavos+N+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Ill: čaˊposân
    čavos+N+Sg+Loc: čaˊposist
    čavos+N+Sg+Com: čaˊposáin
    čavos+N+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+N+Ess: [čaˊposin, čaˊvosin]
    čavos+N+Par: [čaˊposid, čaˊvosid]
    čavos+N+Pl+Nom: čaˊposeh
    čavos+N+Pl+Gen: čaˊposij
    čavos+N+Pl+Acc: čaˊposijd
    čavos+N+Pl+Ill: čaˊposáid
    čavos+N+Pl+Loc: čaˊposijn
    čavos+N+Pl+Com: čaˊposijguin
    čavos+N+Pl+Abe: čaˊposijttáá
